Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 5

Revocation of Certificate of Authority

48-246-501. Revocation of certificate of authority.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under § 48-246-502 to revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this state if:

The foreign LLC does not deliver its annual report to the secretary of state within two (2) months after it is due;

The foreign LLC is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for two (2) months or more;

The foreign LLC does not inform the secretary of state under § 48-208-102 or § 48-208-103 that its registered agent or registered office has changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued within two (2) months of the change, resignation, or discontinuance;

The name of the foreign LLC contained in a document filed pursuant to this title fails to comply with § 48-246-201;

A member or representative of the foreign LLC signed a document such person knew was false in any material respect with the intent that the document be delivered to the secretary of state for filing;

The secretary of state receives a duly authenticated certificate from the secretary of state or other official having custody of the foreign LLC's records in the jurisdiction under whose law the foreign LLC is organized, stating that it has been terminated or has disappeared as the result of a merger;

The foreign LLC is exceeding the authority conferred upon it by this chapter; or

The foreign LLC submits to the office of the secretary of state a check, bank draft, money order or other such instrument for payment of any fee and it is dishonored upon presentation for payment.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 83.

48-246-502. Procedure for and effect of revocation.

If the secretary of state determines that one (1) or more grounds exist under § 48-246-501 for revocation of a certificate of authority, the secretary of state shall serve the foreign LLC with written communication of the secretary of state's determination, except that such determination may be sent by first class mail. Notice need not be sent if the grounds for revocation are pursuant to § 48-246-501(5) and a certificate of revocation may be sent without the two (2) month waiting period required by subsection (b).

If the foreign LLC does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within two (2) months after service of the communication, the secretary of state may revoke the foreign LLC's certificate of authority by signing a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the foreign LLC, except that the certificate may be sent by first class mail.

The authority of a foreign LLC to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate revoking its certificate of authority.

The secretary of state's revocation of a foreign LLC's certificate of authority appoints the secretary of state the foreign LLC's agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action which arose during the time the foreign LLC was authorized to transact business in this state. Service of process on the secretary of state under this subsection (d) is service on the foreign LLC. Upon receipt of process, the secretary of state shall comply with § 48-208-105.

Revocation of a foreign LLC's certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the LLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-246-503. Reinstatement following administrative revocation.

A foreign LLC whose certificate of authority is administratively revoked under § 48-246-502 may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement. The application must:

Be accompanied by a confirmation of good standing relative to such foreign LLC;

Recite the name of the foreign LLC at its date of revocation;

State that the ground or grounds for revocation either did not exist or have been eliminated; and

State a foreign LLC name that satisfies the requirements of § 48-246-201.

If the secretary of state determines that the application is accompanied by the confirmation of good standing and contains the information required by subsection (a), and that such information is correct, then the secretary of state shall reinstate the certificate of authority, prepare a certificate that recites the secretary of state's determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the foreign LLC; and

If the foreign LLC name in subdivision (a)(4) is different than the foreign LLC name in subdivision (a)(2), the application for reinstatement shall constitute an amendment to its certificate of authority insofar as it pertains to the foreign LLC name.

When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative revocation and the foreign LLC resumes carrying on its business as if the administrative revocation had never occurred.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, §§ 33, 34; 2011, ch. 99, §§ 8-10.

48-246-504. Appeal from denial of foreign LLC's reinstatement.

If the secretary of state denies a foreign LLC's application for reinstatement following administrative revocation, the secretary of state shall serve the foreign LLC with a writing that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The foreign LLC may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the chancery court of Davidson County within one (1) month after service of the writing by petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of the secretary of state's writing.

The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-246-505. Cancellation of certificate of authority following administrative revocation.

When a foreign LLC, which has had its certificate of authority revoked, wishes to withdraw from the state, it may do so without first being reinstated by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a certificate of cancellation of authority following administrative revocation of the certificate of authority. The application shall set forth:

The name of the foreign LLC and the date of revocation, its current name, if different, and the name of the jurisdiction under whose law it is organized;

That it is not transacting business in this state and that it surrenders its authority to transact business in this state;

That it either continues its registered agent in this state or revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to transact business in this state;

A mailing address to which the secretary of state may mail a copy of any process served on the secretary of state under subdivision (a)(3); and

A commitment to notify the secretary of state in the future of any change in its mailing address.

The secretary of state shall file the certificate of cancellation of authority of the foreign LLC if the secretary of state finds that the application:

Complies with subsection (a); and

Is accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such foreign LLC.

After cancellation of the certificate of authority of the foreign LLC, service of process on the secretary of state or the continued registered agent under this section is service on the foreign LLC. Upon receipt of process, the secretary of state shall mail a copy of the process to the foreign LLC at the mailing address set forth under subdivision (a)(4).

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, § 35.